Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 8.3
UNIFORM MILITARY AND OVERSEAS VOTERS ACT

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2011. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PREFATORY NOTE

Over five million military personnel and overseas civilians face a variety of legal and logistical obstacles to participating in American elections. These problems persist notwithstanding repeated congressional efforts, as well as various state efforts, to facilitate these voters' ability to vote, most prominently the enactment of the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act of 1986 (UOCAVA), and its amendment with the Military and Overseas Voter Empowerment Act of 2009 (MOVE). The obstacles include: difficulties in registering to vote from abroad; ballots or ballot applications that never arrive; frequent changes of address; slow mail delivery times to and from overseas citizens, especially military personnel; failures to complete absentee voting materials properly, including noncompliance with notarization or verification requirements that can be difficult to meet abroad; and difficulties in obtaining information about issues and candidates.

Data from the 2006 federal midterm election provide dramatic evidence of the problems that these voters have recently faced. In 2006 U.S. military personnel were slightly more likely to have registered to vote than the general U.S. population (87% vs. 83%), yet the voter participation rate among the military was about half that of the general population (roughly 20% vs. roughly 40%). Furthermore, only 25% of overseas and military voters who requested an absentee ballot in 2006 completed and returned one, compared to 85% of all voters who requested an absentee ballot. Meanwhile, more than one in five ballots cast by military service members was rejected.

Although some of these figures improved during the high-interest 2008 presidential election, the overall picture remains troubling. In 2008, roughly two-thirds of those overseas and military voters who requested a ballot returned it, and the rejection rate for those ballots dropped to under one in fifteen ballots. Yet both of these rates remain substantially worse than the comparable 2008 rates for absentee voters generally (which were a return rate of over 90%, and a ballot rejection rate of 1.7%). Meanwhile, according to data collected by the U.S. Election Assistance Commission, fewer than 700,000 absentee ballots were returned by military and overseas voters in 2008. This figure is not much different from the comparable figure for the 2006 federal midterm elections, meaning that the voter participation rate among these voters remained well below 20%, despite the fact that among voters generally the 2008 election produced an overall voter participation rate of over 61%, the largest in four decades. Without additional reforms to the voting processes for military and overseas voters, their ability to participate in American elections likely will continue to suffer.

Strong popular support exists among the American public to make voting much easier and more reliable for these voters than it has been. A 2008 public opinion survey conducted for the Pew Center on the States found "strong universal support . . . across age, regional, and party lines" for the idea that military and overseas voters should be able to participate in elections "back home." A variety of stakeholders who participated in the ULC drafting process for this act were overwhelmingly of a similar disposition.

In important part, the obstacles that overseas and military voters face can be traced to the fact that American elections are conducted at the state and local levels under procedures that often vary dramatically by jurisdiction. This lack of uniformity complicates any federal effort, such as the UOCAVA, to assist these voters to surmount the other major obstacles that they face. For instance, while some states permit overseas absentee ballots to arrive up to ten days after Election Day, other states require that all absentee ballots, including those from overseas, be received by Election Day. Meanwhile, some states permit overseas and military voters to request, and in a smaller number of cases also to cast, an absentee ballot electronically, but other states require transmission by regular mail. Some states require a notary or other witness to vouch for the absentee voter's execution of the absentee ballot affirmation. These and other variations across states both complicate the procedures developed under the UOCAVA to help overseas and military voters, and make it difficult for consular officials, the U.S. military, and non-governmental voting assistance groups to give standard advice to these voters.

In confronting these problems, this act has two independent purposes that can only be achieved through uniform state legislation. The first is to extend to state elections the assistance and protections for military and overseas voters currently found in federal law, which covers only biennial federal elections. The second is to bring greater uniformity to the military and overseas voting processes, which the several states will continue to have primary responsibility for administering, in both federal and non-federal elections. In addition to these two primary purposes, many provisions of the act also enhance the assistance and protections provided to military and overseas voters, wherever this can be done without compromising the integrity of the voting process or imposing inappropriately on election officials.

Critical to both enhancing and bringing uniformity to the voting process for military and overseas voters is establishing adequate time for this group of voters to request, receive, and return a ballot. Directly related to the amount of time needed to accomplish these voting processes is the extent to which electronic transmission mechanisms are employed. The act requires that electronic transmission methods be available for purposes of requesting and receiving unvoted ballots, but does not require the use of electronic means for transmitting voted ballots. This is because no consensus yet exists on the question of whether and how electronic voting can occur securely and privately. However, using electronic transmission methods for just those steps in the absentee voting process prior to the casting of a ballot (such as registering to vote, requesting an absentee ballot, and receiving a blank ballot) can alone dramatically reduce the time required to permit these voters to vote successfully.

Without uniform state legislation, military and overseas voters will continue to confront a panoply of diverging voting requirements, notwithstanding the important role that UOCAVA has played in facilitating military and overseas voting in federal elections for more than two decades, and the additional enhancements that the MOVE Act of 2009 provides. Accordingly, this act should be widely adopted both to simplify the voting process for these voters, and to extend similar protections to state elections not covered by existing federal law.

1-8.3-101. Short title.

This article may be cited as the "Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act".

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 664, § 1, effective May 13.

1-8.3-102. Definitions.

In this article 8.3:

"Ballot" means:

A federal write-in absentee ballot;

A ballot specifically prepared or distributed for use by a covered voter in accordance with this article; or

A ballot cast by a covered voter in accordance with this article.

"Covered voter" means:

A uniformed-service voter defined in paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section who is a resident of this state but who is absent from this state by reason of active duty and who otherwise satisfies this state's voter eligibility requirements;

An overseas voter who, before leaving the United States, was last eligible to vote in this state and, except for a state residency requirement, otherwise satisfies this state's voter eligibility requirements;

An overseas voter who, before leaving the United States, would have been last eligible to vote in this state had the voter then been of voting age and, except for a state residency requirement, otherwise satisfies this state's voter eligibility requirements; or

An overseas voter who was born outside the United States, is not described in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection (2), and, except for a state residency requirement, otherwise satisfies this state's voter eligibility requirements if the last place where a parent, legal guardian, spouse, or civil union partner of the voter was, or under this article would have been, eligible to vote before leaving the United States is within this state.

"Dependent" means a spouse, civil union partner, or dependent of a covered voter described in subsection (2) of this section who is a resident of this state but who is absent from the state by reason of the active duty or service of the covered voter.

"Federal postcard application" means the application prescribed under section 101 (b)(2) of the federal "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20301 (b)(2).

"Federal write-in absentee ballot" means the ballot described in section 103 of the federal "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20303.

"Overseas voter" means a United States citizen who is outside the United States.

"State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

"Uniformed service" means:

Active and reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard of the United States;

The merchant marine, the commissioned corps of the public health service, or the commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration of the United States; or

The National Guard.

"Uniformed-service voter" means an individual who is qualified to vote and is:

A member of the active or reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard of the United States who is on active duty;

A member of the merchant marine, the commissioned corps of the public health service, or the commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration of the United States;

A member on activated status of the National Guard; or

A spouse, civil union partner, or dependent of a member referred to in this subsection (9).

"United States", used in the territorial sense, means the several states, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, and any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 664, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2013:

(3) and (9)(d) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 744, § 104, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(2)(d) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 565, § 21, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(4) and (5) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 584, § 54, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

IP, (8)(a), and (9)(a) amended, (HB 21-1231), ch. 206, p. 1076, § 1, effective May 28.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (3) and (9)(d) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.3-103. Elections covered.

The voting procedures in this article apply to:

A general, congressional vacancy, or primary election for federal office;

A general, recall, or primary election for statewide or state legislative office or state ballot measure;

Any other election coordinated by the county clerk and recorder; and

An election conducted under article 13.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 666, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2014:

(1)(d) added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 73, § 39, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-8.3-104. Role of secretary of state.

The secretary of state is the state official responsible for implementing this article and the state's responsibilities under the federal "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20301 et seq.

The secretary of state shall make available to covered voters information regarding voter registration procedures for covered voters and procedures for casting ballots. The secretary of state may delegate the responsibility under this subsection (2) only to the state office designated in compliance with section 102 (b)(1) of the federal "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20302 (b)(1).

The secretary of state shall establish an electronic transmission system through which a covered voter may apply for and receive voter registration materials, ballots, and other information under this article.

The secretary of state shall:

Develop standardized absentee-voting materials, including privacy and transmission envelopes and their electronic equivalents, authentication materials, and voting instructions, to be used with the ballot of a voter authorized to vote in any jurisdiction in this state; and

To the extent reasonably possible, coordinate with other states to carry out this subsection (4).

The secretary of state shall prescribe the form and content of a declaration for use by a covered voter to swear or affirm specific representations pertaining to the voter's identity, eligibility to vote, status as a covered voter, and timely and proper completion of a ballot. The declaration shall be based on the declaration prescribed to accompany a federal write-in absentee ballot, as modified to be consistent with this article. The secretary of state shall ensure that a form for the execution of the declaration, including an indication of the date of execution of the declaration, is a prominent part of all balloting materials for which the declaration is required.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 666, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2016:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 584, § 55, effective May 18.

1-8.3-105. Effect of "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act" - emergency authority of secretary of state.

In the event of any conflict between this article and any provisions of the federal "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20301 et seq., the provisions of the federal act shall control, and all designated election officials who are charged with the performance of duties under this code shall perform the duties and discharge the obligations placed upon them by the federal act.

If a national or local emergency arises that makes substantial compliance with the provisions of this article impossible or unreasonable, such as when congress has declared a national emergency or the president has ordered into active military service of the United States any units and members of the National Guard of this state, the secretary of state may prescribe, by emergency orders or rules, such special procedures or requirements as may be necessary to facilitate absentee voting by those members of the military or military support personnel directly affected by the emergency.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 667, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 585, § 56, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-8-103 as it existed prior to 2011.

1-8.3-106. Overseas voter's registration address.

In registering to vote, an overseas voter who is eligible to vote in this state shall use and shall be assigned to the voting precinct of the address of the last place of residence of the voter in this state, or, in the case of a voter described by section 1-8.3-102 (2)(d), the address of the last place of residence in this state of the parent or legal guardian of the voter. If that address is no longer a recognized residential address, the voter shall be assigned an address for voting purposes.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 667, § 1, effective May 13.

1-8.3-107. Methods of registering to vote.

To apply to register to vote, in addition to any other approved method, a covered voter may use a federal postcard application, or the application's electronic equivalent.

A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot to apply to register to vote simultaneously with the submission of the federal write-in absentee ballot. If the declaration is received after the election, it shall be treated as an application to register to vote for subsequent elections.

The secretary of state shall ensure that the electronic transmission system described in section 1-8.3-104 (3) is capable of accepting both a federal postcard application and any other approved electronic registration application sent to the appropriate election official. The voter may use the electronic transmission system or any other approved method to register to vote.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 668, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 744, § 105, effective May 10.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1614, § 31, effective May 29.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (2) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.3-108. Methods of applying for ballot - definition.

Repealed.

A covered voter who is not registered to vote in this state may use a federal postcard application or the application's electronic equivalent to apply simultaneously to register to vote under section 1-8.3-107 and for a ballot.

The secretary of state shall ensure that the electronic transmission system described in section 1-8.3-104 (3) is capable of accepting the submission of both a federal postcard application and any other approved electronic ballot application sent to the appropriate election official. The voter may use the electronic transmission system or any other approved method to apply for a military-overseas ballot.

A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot as an application for a ballot simultaneously with the submission of the federal write-in absentee ballot.

To receive the benefits of this article, a covered voter shall inform the appropriate election official that the voter is a covered voter. Methods of informing the appropriate election official that a voter is a covered voter include:

The use of a federal postcard application or federal write-in absentee ballot;

The use of an overseas address on an approved voter registration application or ballot application; and

The inclusion on an approved voter registration application or ballot application of other information sufficient to identify the voter as a covered voter.

This article does not preclude a covered voter from voting under article 7.5 or 8 of this title.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a covered voter in a hostile fire zone may provide to an officer, either verbally or in writing, the information required for the covered voter to apply for a ballot, and the officer may submit an application for a ballot on behalf of the covered voter. A county clerk and recorder shall accept an unsigned federal postcard application or an unsigned letter of application for a ballot that meets the requirements of this section if the officer submits with the application a signed statement that the covered voter in a hostile fire zone provided to the officer, either verbally or in writing, the information required to apply for a ballot.

As used in this subsection (7), "covered voter in a hostile fire zone" means a covered voter, as that term is defined in section 1-8.3-102 (2)(a), who is located in an area that is designated as a hostile fire zone by the United States secretary of defense at the time he or she makes the request for a ballot.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 668, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2012:

(7) added, (SB 12-062), ch. 97, p. 327, § 3, effective April 12.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 73, § 40, effective February 18; (4) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 565, § 22, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(1) repealed, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 593, § 82, effective May 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-8.3-109. Timeliness of application for ballot.

If an applicant wishes to receive a ballot by mail, the application shall be received no later than the close of business on the seventh day before the election.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 669, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 565, § 23, effective May 9.

1-8.3-110. Transmission of unvoted ballots.

For an election described in section 1-8.3-103 for which this state has not received a waiver pursuant to section 579 of the federal "Military and Overseas Voter Empowerment Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20302 (g)(2), not later than forty-five days before the election, the election official in each jurisdiction charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials shall transmit a ballot and balloting materials to all covered voters who by that date submit a valid ballot application.

A covered voter who requests that a ballot and balloting materials be sent to the voter by electronic transmission may choose facsimile transmission or electronic mail delivery, or, if offered by the voter's jurisdiction, other electronic means. The election official in each jurisdiction charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials shall transmit the ballot and balloting materials to the voter using the means of transmission chosen by the voter.

If a ballot application from a covered voter arrives after the jurisdiction begins transmitting ballots and balloting materials to voters, the official charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials shall transmit them to the voter within seventy-two hours after the receipt of the application.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 669, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 585, § 57, effective May 18.

1-8.3-111. Timely casting of ballot.

To be valid, a ballot shall be received by the appropriate local election official not later than the close of the polls, or the voter shall submit the ballot for mailing, electronic transmission, or other authorized means of delivery not later than 7:00 p.m. mountain time on the date of the election.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 669, § 1, effective May 13.

1-8.3-112. Federal write-in absentee ballot.

A covered voter may use a federal write-in absentee ballot to vote for all offices and ballot measures in an election described in section 1-8.3-103.

The covered voter may designate the candidate by writing in the name of the candidate or by writing in the name of a political party or political organization, in which case the ballot shall be counted for the candidate of that political party or political organization. Any abbreviation, misspelling, or other minor variation in the form of the name of the candidate, political party, or political organization shall be disregarded in determining the validity of the ballot as long as the intention of the covered voter can be ascertained.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 669, § 1, effective May 13.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) is similar to former § 1-8-117 (4)(b) as it existed prior to 2011.

1-8.3-113. Transmission and receipt of ballot.

A covered voter who requested and received ballot materials by electronic transmission may also return the ballot by electronic transmission:

In circumstances where another more secure method, such as returning the ballot by mail, is not available or feasible, as specified in rules promulgated by the secretary of state; or

If the ballot is for a recall election conducted under article 12 of this code.

A valid ballot cast in accordance with section 1-8.3-111 shall be counted if it is received by the close of business on the eighth day after an election at the address that the appropriate state or local election office has specified.

If, at the time of completing a ballot and balloting materials, the voter has declared under penalty of perjury that the ballot was timely submitted, the ballot shall not be rejected as late.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 670, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 622, § 13, effective May 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-8.3-114. Declaration.

A ballot shall include or be accompanied by the signed affirmation required by the federal "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20301 et seq.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 670, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 585, § 58, effective May 18.

1-8.3-115. Use of covered voter's electronic-mail address.

The local election official shall request an electronic-mail address from each covered voter who registers to vote after May 13, 2011. An electronic-mail address provided by a covered voter shall not be made available to the public or any individual or organization other than an authorized agent of the local election official and is exempt from disclosure under article 72 of title 24, C.R.S. The address may be used only for official communication with the voter about the voting process, including transmitting ballots and election materials if the voter has requested electronic transmission, and verifying the voter's mailing address and physical location. The request for an electronic-mail address shall describe the purposes for which the electronic-mail address may be used and include a statement that any other use or disclosure of the electronic-mail address is prohibited.

Unless a covered voter applies to be a permanent mail voter pursuant to section 1-13.5-1003, the covered voter who provides an electronic-mail address may request that the voter's application for a military-overseas ballot be considered a standing request for electronic delivery of a ballot for all elections held through December 31 of the year following the calendar year of the date of the application or another shorter period the voter specifies. An election official shall provide a military-overseas ballot to a voter who makes a standing request for each election to which the request is applicable. A covered voter who is entitled to receive a ballot for a primary election under this subsection (2) is entitled to receive a ballot for the general election.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 670, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 73, § 41, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-8.3-116. Publication of election notice.

At least one hundred days before a regularly scheduled election and as soon as practicable before an election not regularly scheduled, the secretary of state shall prepare an election notice to be used in conjunction with a federal write-in absentee ballot. The election notice shall contain a list of all of the federal and state offices that as of that date the secretary of state expects to be on the ballot on the date of the election. The notice shall also contain specific instructions for how a voter is to indicate on the federal write-in absentee ballot the voter's choice for each office to be filled and for each ballot measure to be contested. The secretary of state shall post the notice on the official website of the secretary of state.

A covered voter may request a copy of an election notice. The county clerk and recorder shall send the notice to the voter by facsimile, electronic mail, or regular mail, as the voter requests.

As soon as ballot styles are certified, and not later than the date ballots are required to be transmitted to voters under article 7.5 or 8 of this title, the secretary of state shall update the notice with the certified statewide ballot questions and candidates for each office.

A county having one or more covered voters and that maintains a website shall provide a link to the election notice maintained on the secretary of state's official website.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 671, § 1, effective May 13.

1-8.3-117. Covered voter may file complaint.

Any covered voter alleging a grievance may file a complaint with the secretary of state as specified in section 1-1.5-105.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 671, § 1, effective May 13.

1-8.3-118. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this article, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 671, § 1, effective May 13.

1-8.3-119. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This article modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 (c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 (c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103 (b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003 (b).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 671, § 1, effective May 13.